Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.450

Partners' interests—Transfer restriction.

The partnership agreement may restrict the transfer of partners' interests in the partnership from the date the demand for their payment is received until the proposed merger becomes effective or the restriction is released under this article.

[ 1998 c 103 s 1007.]